Utah statutes.
76-10-701.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Bona fide stockholder of record" means a stockholder of record who has acquired stock in good faith and is acting for a proper purpose reasonably related to his interests as a stockholder.

(2)  "Director" means any of the persons having by law the direction or management of the affairs of a corporation, by whatever name the persons are described in its charter or known by law.

